Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 8 District Court

8-8-1.
District Court established — Chief and associate justices.

There is established a district court for the state of Rhode Island which shall consist of a chief judge and fourteen (14) associate judges. The district court shall be a court of record and shall have a seal with such words and devices as it shall adopt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

8-8-1.1.
Veterans’ treatment calendar.

Findings and declarations. The general assembly finds and declares as follows:

Veterans and active military, Reserve, and National Guard service members have provided, or are currently providing, an invaluable service to our country. In doing so, many return and suffer from mental health injuries, including, but not limited to, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, anxiety, acute stress, and other injuries that may affect brain function and may also suffer drug and alcohol dependency or co-occurring mental illness and substance abuse problems.

The call back to active duty status rate of Rhode Island’s National Guard is the second highest in the entire United States with over ten thousand (10,000) unit deployments.

The number of veterans living in Rhode Island who have served in the Gulf Wars is three (3) times higher than the national per-capita average and is expected to grow as troops continue to withdraw from Afghanistan.

While the vast majority of returning military do not have contact with the justice system and are well adjusted, contributing members of society, there exists a growing number of defendants appearing in the district court who have served in the United States armed forces and are involved in the criminal justice system as a result of the above-referenced diagnoses.

As a grateful state, we must continue to honor the service of these participants by providing them an alternative to incarceration when feasible, permitting them instead to obtain proper treatment for mental health and substance abuse problems that have resulted from military service through a jail diversion program/treatment program that recognizes their special set of circumstances while at the same time providing accountability for their wrong doing and providing for the safety of the public.

Declaration of policy. It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Rhode Island to successfully rehabilitate participants by providing the tools and skills necessary to address their unique challenges and to develop the insight to reintegrate successfully into society and maintain a productive and law-abiding lifestyle within the community.

Establishment. To accomplish this purpose in an effort to direct defendants who have served in the United States armed forces into a court program that integrates support and treatment plans with the judicial process that will result in potential jail diversion, possible reduction of charges, or alternatives in sentencing, there shall be established a separate calendar within the jurisdiction of the district court for hearing, trial and disposition of certain offenses.

Veterans’ treatment calendar. The chief judge of the district court shall create a veterans’ treatment calendar in the district court and shall assign personnel to the extent warranted to exclusively hear and decide all criminal actions involving offenses committed by defendants accepted into the program, and the calendar shall be referred to as the “veterans’ treatment court.”

Use of section. Under no circumstances shall the defendant(s) be permitted to use this section as a basis for a dismissal of an action, as this section is enacted for the benefit and convenience of the district court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 15, § 2.

8-8-1.2.
Mental health treatment calendar.

Findings and declarations. The general assembly finds and declares as follows:

Mental illness is a prevalent and persistent issue in Rhode Island within the criminal population in general and the incarcerated population in particular. Approximately one-fifth (1/5) of all inmates at the adult correctional institutions have a diagnosed mental illness, while nearly eighty percent (80%) have a history of substance abuse. Many suffer from both maladies.

Mental illness can often go unrecognized and untreated, leaving some individuals to suffer and spiral downward until they are caught in the criminal justice system. These individuals often become trapped in a cycle of repeated prosecution and incarceration.

Individuals with mental illness who are charged with crimes can benefit from alternatives to incarceration when feasible, and when permitted to obtain proper treatment for persistent mental health and substance abuse disorders through a jail diversion treatment program that recognizes their special set of circumstances while at the same time providing accountability for their wrongdoing and providing for the safety of the public.

The district court shall create a voluntary mental health treatment calendar to better address individuals who suffer from mental illness and are charged with a misdemeanor. The district court will provide the tools and skills necessary to address these individuals’ unique challenges thus helping them develop the insight needed to reintegrate successfully into society and maintain a productive and law-abiding lifestyle within the community.

There shall be established, funded, and staffed a mental health alternative sentencing and treatment calendar within the jurisdiction of the district court for hearing, addressing, and disposing of certain misdemeanor offenses in an effort to direct eligible defendants into a court program that integrates support and treatment plans with the judicial process, potentially resulting in alternatives to traditional prosecution, sentencing, and incarceration; reducing the risk of recidivism; and realizing cost savings for the state and increasing public safety. Successful completion may result in a full dismissal of charges or in reduced charges and alternative sentencing. The mental health treatment calendar shall be overseen by a district court judge to be appointed pursuant to chapter 16.1 of this title, subject to an appropriation made by the general assembly.

The chief judge of the district court shall create a mental health treatment calendar in the district court and shall assign a district court judge and associated personnel to the extent necessary to hear and decide all criminal actions involving offenses committed by defendants accepted into the program. [The calendar shall be called the mental health treatment calendar.]

An eligible defendant is any person who stands charged in a district court complaint with one or more misdemeanors, and:

Suffers from a mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder resulting in serious functional impairment which substantially interferes with or limits one or more major life activities; and

Is determined by the court to be appropriate for participation in the mental health treatment calendar.

An individual’s history of substance and alcohol abuse may also be considered to the extent necessary to make a proper diagnosis of a co-occurring disorder.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

8-8-2.
Divisions.

For the distribution of court business, the state is divided into four (4) divisions as follows:

Second division. The second division consists of the city of Newport and the towns of Jamestown, Little Compton, Middletown, Portsmouth, and Tiverton. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the second division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Second Division District Court to the clerk of the Newport County Superior Court.

Third division. The third division consists of the city of Warwick and the city of Cranston and the towns of Coventry, East Greenwich, Foster, Glocester, Johnston, Lincoln, North Kingstown, North Providence, North Smithfield, Scituate, Smithfield, West Greenwich and West Warwick. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the third division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Third Division District Court to the clerk of the Kent County Superior Court.

Fourth division. The fourth division consists of the towns of Charlestown, Exeter, Hopkinton, Narragansett, New Shoreham, Richmond, South Kingstown, and Westerly. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the fourth division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Fourth Division District Court to the clerk of the Washington County Superior Court.

Sixth division. The sixth division consists of the cities of Central Falls, East Providence, Providence, Pawtucket, Woonsocket and the towns of Barrington, Bristol, Burrillville, Cumberland and Warren. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the sixth division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Sixth Division District Court to the clerk of the Providence County Superior Court.

In each division the place or places for holding court shall be designated by the chief judge.

The district court shall have a seal for each of its divisions, which shall contain the words, “District court of the State of Rhode Island, division.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1975, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 3, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 3, effective June 23, 2021.

8-8-3.
Jurisdiction.

The district court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of:

All civil actions at law, but not causes in equity or those following the course of equity except as provided in §

8-8-3.1

and chapter 8.1 of this title, wherein the amount in controversy does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000);

All actions between landlords and tenants pursuant to chapter 18 of title 34 and all other actions for possession of premises and estates notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this section;

All actions of replevin where the goods and chattels to be replevied are of the value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less;

All violations of minimum housing standards whether established by chapter 24.3 of title 45 or by any municipal ordinance, rule, or regulation passed pursuant to the authority granted either by chapter 24.2 of title 45 or by special act of the general assembly governing minimum housing standards; except that in the event the city of Providence or town of North Providence shall by ordinance create a court for the purpose of exercising jurisdiction over violations of minimum housing standards, Providence Municipal Zoning Code and the Rhode Island State Building Code, chapter 27.3 of title 23, concerning properties which are not owned by the state, upon enactment of the ordinance, that court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of violations of the above listed codes and standards as defined herein occurring within the city of Providence or the town of North Providence, and the district court shall be without jurisdiction over those actions;

All suits and complaints for offenses against the bylaws, ordinances, and regulations of cities and towns whether passed by the cities or towns or under the law by the properly constituted authorities thereof;

All other actions, proceedings, and matters of whatever nature which are or shall be declared to be within the jurisdiction of the court by the laws of the state.

The district court shall also have any special jurisdiction which is or may be conferred by charter or law upon justices of the peace if no special court exists or is created by charter or law for that purpose.

The district court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction with the superior court of all civil actions at law wherein the amount in controversy exceeds the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000); provided, however, that in any such action, any one or more defendants may in the answer to the complaint demand removal of the action to the superior court, in which event the action shall proceed as if it had been filed originally in the superior court.

The district court shall have special jurisdiction to grant relief as set forth under §

15-15-4(b)(1)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1977, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 215, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 16; P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 4; P.L. 1986, ch. 547, § 7; P.L. 1987, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 240, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 214, § 2.

8-8-3.1.
Equitable powers as to housing matters.

In addition to the powers heretofore exercised, the district court and any court created by municipal ordinance pursuant to §

8-8-3(a)(4)

is hereby empowered, in furtherance of its jurisdiction under §

8-8-3(a)(4)

, to grant such orders, including temporary restraining orders, and preliminary and permanent injunctions as justice and equity may require.

Any court created by municipal ordinance pursuant to §

8-8-3(a)(4)

is hereby empowered in furtherance of its jurisdiction to order a building into receivership pursuant to the provisions of chapter 44 of title 34 (“abandoned property”).

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 461, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 474, § 1.

8-8-3.2.
Record and appeal of housing matters.

An electronic record shall be made of the proceedings in the trial or hearing of every action in the district court under the provisions of §

8-8-3(a)(4)

. If ordered by the judge trying or hearing the matter a typewritten transcription of the record shall be made and shall be filed with the papers of the case. The transcript shall be completed and filed within the time allowed by the court. A copy of the transcript shall be delivered forthwith to the attorneys of record and for the typing of the transcript a reasonable fee shall be allowed by the court. In the event the typewritten transcription is used in subsequent proceedings the cost of obtaining the transcript shall be allowed as part of the cost of the case.

Any party aggrieved by a final judgment, decree, or order of the district court under §

8-8-3(a)(4)

may, within twenty (20) days after entry of judgment, petition the supreme court of the state of Rhode Island for a writ of certiorari to review any errors involved. The petition for a writ of certiorari shall set forth the errors claimed. Upon the filing of such a petition with the clerk of the supreme court, the supreme court may, if it sees fit, issue its writ of certiorari to the district court to certify to the supreme court the record of the proceedings in the case together with any transcript of the proceedings furnished by the petitioner at his or her expense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 134, § 1.

8-8-3.3.
Equitable powers in residential landlord and tenant matters.

In addition to the powers heretofore exercised, the district court is hereby empowered, in furtherance of its jurisdiction under §

8-8-3(a)(2)

, to grant such orders, including temporary restraining orders, and preliminary and permanent injunctions as justice and equity may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 5.

8-8-4.
Habeas corpus.

The district court may issue writs of habeas corpus to bring before it any person in jail for trial in any civil or criminal case pending in the court, or to bring in any such person to be examined as a witness in a suit or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending in the court, that the ends of justice may be attained, and for no other purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-5.
Contempt of court.

The district court may punish any contempt of its authority by fine or imprisonment or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-6.
Special service of process.

The district court may order special service of any process, original or auxiliary, in any proceeding within the jurisdiction of the court, by personal notice, notice by mail, or publication in a newspaper within or without the state, for the purpose of dealing with any property, relation, or person subject to the jurisdiction of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-7.
Judges — Temporary service in other courts.

A district court judge shall devote full time to his or her judicial duties. He or she shall not practice law while holding office, nor shall he or she be a partner or associate of any person in the practice of law.

A district court judge shall be eligible to sit in any division, and, on assignment by the chief justice of the supreme court, shall be eligible to sit for temporary periods in the superior and family courts. A district court judge sitting in the superior or family court shall receive the same salary as a superior or family court judge would receive, and if the district court judge sits for only a portion of a two (2) week pay period in those courts, he or she shall be paid for the entire two (2) week period at the higher rate of pay.

A district court judge, subject to the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, the presiding justice of the superior court and the chief judge of the district court, may serve on the superior court calendar to preside over district court de novo appeals. A district court judge sitting in the superior court presiding over district court de novo appeals shall receive the same salary as a superior court judge would receive.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1971, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 290, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 16; P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 403, § 1.

8-8-8.
Engagement and acceptance of appointment.

Every judge accepting the office shall, within thirty (30) days after appointment, take the engagement provided in §

8-3-1

and shall file a written notice of his or her acceptance, together with proof of his engagement upon his or her commission, with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 118; G.L. 1909, ch. 280, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 330, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 500, § 6; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-8-8

.

8-8-8.1.
Administrator/clerk — Magistrate.

Administrator/clerk. There shall be a district court administrator/clerk who shall be appointed by the chief judge in his or her capacity as administrative head of the court, and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the administrative judge. The administrator/clerk shall perform such duties and attend to such matters as may be assigned to the administrator/clerk by the administrative judge, other than those duties assigned to the chief clerk in §

8-8-19

. Said duties may be assigned by the chief judge.

Magistrate. Any person holding the position of district court administrator/clerk who is a member of the bar of Rhode Island may be appointed district court magistrate by the chief judge in his or her capacity as administrative head of the court, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The district court magistrate shall hold said office for a term of ten (10) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified; and the magistrate shall retain whatever right he or she may have to the position of district court administrator/clerk pursuant to this section. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the appointment of the magistrate for more than one term, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. Any person holding office of district court magistrate on July 1, 1999, may continue in full authority in said position until such time as an appointment is made and the nominee qualified pursuant to this subsection.

The district court magistrate shall have the power to hear and determine such matters as may be assigned to the district court magistrate by the chief judge all to the same effect as if done by a judge of the district court, including, but not limited to:

Matters relating to the determination of, monitoring, collection, and payment of restitution and court-ordered fines, fees, and costs or the ordering of community service in lieu of or in addition to the payment of restitution, fines, fees, and costs, consistent with other provisions of the general laws;

Arraignments and pretrial motions in misdemeanor, petty misdemeanor, violation, and ordinance cases and initial appearances and probable cause hearings in felony cases;

Bail hearings pursuant to

R.I. Const., Art. I, Sec. IX

and all other bail matters pursuant to chapter 13 of title 12 and the rules of criminal procedure, including, but not limited to, motions to modify bail, bail revocation hearings, bail forfeiture hearings, and bail source hearings;

All matters relating to fugitives from justice pursuant to chapter 9 of title 12;

Probation revocation hearings;

All matters relating to small claims and consumer claims pursuant to chapter 16 of title 10, including any pretrial motions including motions relating to the special service of process, the entry of defaults and default judgments, the trial of such cases and the entry of judgment after such trials, and all matters relating to the enforcement of such judgments, including, but not limited to, the ordering of installment payments and trustee process; and

Complaints for judicial review of the decision of an administrative agency pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 by making proposed findings of fact and recommendations for the disposition of the complaints to a judge of the court. Any party may object to any portion of the magistrate’s proposed findings and recommendations within ten (10) days after receipt of a copy thereof. That party shall file with the clerk of the sixth division of the district court and serve on all parties written objections that shall specifically identify the portions of the proposed findings and recommendations to which objection is made and the basis for the objection. A judge shall make a de novo determination of those portions to which objection is made and may accept, reject, or modify, in whole or in part, the findings or recommendations made by the magistrate. Absent a timely objection filed in accordance with this subdivision, the proposed prevailing party shall, upon expiration of the ten (10) days following the service of the magistrate’s proposed findings and recommendations, submit a proposed order for signature of the judge to whom the case has been assigned.

The magistrate may be authorized:

To regulate all proceedings before him or her;

To do all acts necessary or proper for the efficient performance of his or her duties;

To require the production before him or her of books, papers, vouchers, documents, and writings;

To rule upon the admissibility of evidence;

To issue subpoenas for the appearance of witnesses, to put witnesses on oath, to examine them, and to call parties to the proceeding and examine them upon oath;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her fined or to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a judge of the court, for failure to appear in response to a summons or for refusal to answer questions or produce evidence or for behavior disrupting a proceeding or other contempt of his or her authority;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her fined or to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a judge of the court, for failure to comply with a pending order to provide payment or to perform any other act;

To issue a capias and/or body attachment for the failure of a party or witness to appear after having been properly served or given notice by the court and, should the court not be in session, the person apprehended may be detained at the adult correctional institution, if an adult, or at the Rhode Island training school for youth, if a child, until the next session of the court;

To issue writs of habeas corpus to bring before him or her or a judge of the court any person in jail or in prison to be examined as a witness in a suit or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending before the court, or whose presence is necessary as a party or otherwise necessary so that the ends of justice may be attained, and for no other purpose; and

To issue warrants of arrest and search warrants to the same extent as an associate judge of the court.

Except as otherwise indicated, a party aggrieved by an order entered by the district court magistrate shall be entitled to a review of the order, whether by appeal or otherwise, by a judge of the court. The court shall, by rules of procedure, establish procedures for review of contempt and adjudications of the magistrate.

The magistrate shall be:

Governed by the commission on judicial tenure and discipline, chapter 16 of this title, in the same manner as justices and judges;

Subject to all provisions of the canons of judicial ethics;

Subject to all criminal laws relative to judges by virtue of §§

11-7-1

and

11-7-2

.

Any district court magistrate who has been engaged for a period of twenty (20) years and has reached the age of sixty (60) years, may upon retirement, at his or her own request and at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as a magistrate of the district court as the chief judge of the district court shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such service, the district court clerk/magistrate shall have all the powers and authority of a magistrate of the district court but otherwise shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties. Such a retired district court magistrate shall not be counted in the number of magistrates provided by law for the district court.

The provisions of this section shall be afforded liberal construction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 73, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 452, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 11; P.L. 2022, ch. 433, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 434, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

8-8-9.
Vacancies.

Whenever any person appointed to the office of chief judge or associate judge shall fail to accept and qualify for the office or there is a vacancy in the office caused by death, resignation, retirement, removal, or any other cause whatsoever while the senate is in session, the governor shall appoint some person to fill the vacancy, and submit his or her appointment to the senate for confirmation in accordance with the general laws governing judicial selection.

Whenever the chief judge shall be unable, by reason of illness, to perform the duties of his or her office, or there is a vacancy in the office, the associate judge having precedence, who is present and qualified to act, shall perform the duties of the office until the inability is removed or, in the case of a vacancy, until the vacancy shall be filled in accordance with the general laws governing judicial selection. In the event that the chief judge determines that his or her absence will prevent him or her from performing the duties of his or her office, he or she shall designate an associate judge to perform those duties during the period of his or her absence.

The associate judges shall have precedence according to the dates of their commissions, or when the commission of two (2) or more of them bear the same date, according to their ages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1977, ch. 263, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 4.

8-8-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 6, effective June 30, 2009.

8-8-10.1.
Retirement contribution.

Judges engaged after December 31, 1989, shall have deducted from total salary beginning December 31, 1989, and ending June 30, 2012, an amount equal to a rate percent of compensation as specified in §

36-10-1

relating to member contributions to the state retirement system. Effective July 1, 2012, all active judges, whether engaged before or after December 31, 1989, shall have deducted from compensation as defined in §

36-8-1(8)

an amount equal to twelve percent (12%) of compensation. The receipts collected under this provision shall be deposited in a restricted revenue account entitled “Judicial retirement benefits” on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld. Proceeds deposited in this account shall be held in trust for the purpose of paying retirement benefits to participating judges or their beneficiaries. The retirement board shall establish rules and regulations to govern the provisions of this section.

The state is required to deduct and withhold member contributions and to transmit same to the retirement system and is hereby made liable for the contribution. In addition, any amount of employee contributions actually deducted and withheld shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust for the benefit of the member and shall be transmitted to the retirement system as set forth herein.

A member of the judiciary who withdraws from service or ceases to be a member for any reason other than retirement shall be paid on demand a refund consisting of the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in his or her individual account in the judicial retirement benefits account. Any member receiving a refund shall thereby forfeit and relinquish all accrued rights as a member of the system together with credits for total service previously granted to the member; provided, however, that if any member who has received a refund shall subsequently reenter the service and again become a member of the system, the member shall have the privilege of restoring all money previously received or disbursed to his or her credit as refund of contributions plus regular interest for the period from the date of refund to the date of restoration. Upon the repayment of the refund as herein provided, the member shall again receive credit for the amount of total service which he or she had previously forfeited by the acceptance of the refund.

Whenever any judge dies from any cause before retirement and has no surviving spouse, domestic partner, or minor child(ren), a payment shall be made of the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in his or her individual account in the judicial retirement benefits account. The payment of the accumulated contributions of the judge shall be made to such person as the judge shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the retirement board, or if the judge has filed no nomination, or if the person so nominated has died, then to the estate of the deceased judge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 22, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 494, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 507, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 16; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 16; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 2.

8-8-10.2.
State contributions.

The state of Rhode Island shall make its contribution for the maintaining of the system established by §

8-8-10.1

and providing the annuities, benefits, and retirement allowances in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by annually appropriating an amount that will pay a rate percent of the compensation paid after December 31, 1989, to judges engaged after December 31, 1989. The rate percent shall be computed and certified in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

36-8-13

and §

36-10-2

under rules and regulations promulgated by the retirement board pursuant to §

36-8-3

and shall be transmitted on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 494, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 507, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 2.

8-8-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 3. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

8-8-12.
Duties of chief judge.

The chief judge shall be the administrative head of the district court and shall be responsible for its operation and the efficient use of its manpower. To this end he or she shall:

Hold court in any division when he or she deems it necessary;

Assign judges to hold court in the various divisions;

Designate the place or places for holding court in each division;

Fix the time for holding court in each division and supervise the calendars;

Report annually to the chief justice of the supreme court on the state of the business of the district court;

Supervise the collection and publication of statistics pertaining to the court;

Supervise the management of the records of the court;

Determine the time of vacations to be taken by the district judges;

Preside over the district court conference and designate the time and place that it shall be held;

Promulgate rules and regulations relating to:

The licensing of constables to serve certain district court civil process; and

The duties and conduct of licensed constables.

The chief judge of the district court may designate an associate judge of the district court as administrative judge of the district court. The administrative judge may exercise such administrative authority as may be delegated to him or her by the chief judge. The administrative judge shall receive an increase in compensation which shall be set pursuant to §

8-15-4

.

The chief judge of the district court shall appoint sufficient court recorders to enable all proceedings to be recorded by electronic means and who shall assist in such other clerical duties subject to the labor laws of this state and applicable collective bargaining agreement as may be prescribed from time to time by the chief judge of the district court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1971, ch. 183, § 4; P.L. 1982, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 11.

8-8-12.1.
Constable regulation program.

Creation of program. There is hereby created “the district court constable regulation program” which shall be administered under the direction of the chief judge of the district court.

Revenues. The annual license renewal fee assessed to each district court constable shall be set from time to time by the chief judge. The revenues shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 38.

8-8-13.
Sessions of the court.

The district court shall be in continuous session for the transaction of any business that may come before it; provided, however, that the court shall not be in session on Sundays and legal holidays for the transaction of civil business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4. Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 38, § 1, effective May 21, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 40, § 1, effective May 21, 2015.

8-8-15.
Chief, deputy, and assistant clerks.

There shall be a chief clerk of the district court. In the month of April of 1971 and in each fifth year thereafter, the chief judge of the district court, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the chief clerk of the district court who shall hold office until the first day in April in the fifth year next after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. In case of a vacancy in the office of clerk of the district court, from any cause, the chief judge of the district court, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint some person to fill the vacancy for the balance of the unexpired term and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. In case of the death, resignation, absence, inability, or refusal to serve of the clerk, the chief judge may appoint a clerk pro tempore, who shall hold his or her office until the clerk shall have returned or the inability shall have been removed or another clerk shall have been appointed to fill such a vacancy and shall have qualified.

The chief judge of the district court shall appoint a deputy clerk for each division and assistant clerks in the various divisions of the district court to serve at his or her pleasure. All such clerks and the chief clerk may administer oaths within the state.

The clerks of the court shall devote their full time to their duties. They are not required to be members of the bar of this state, but if a member of the bar of this state is appointed a clerk, he or she shall not practice law during his or her term in office nor shall he or she be a partner or associate of any person engaged in the practice of law.

The chief judge of the district court shall have the power to authorize, with the power to revoke such authorizations, the chief clerk, the deputy clerks, and the assistant clerks of the district court to set and take bail on all complaints bailable before a division of the district court to the same extent and with the same authority as is granted to justices of the peace authorized to set and take bail by §

12-10-2

. The authorizations and revocations shall be recorded with the secretary of state. District court clerks may exercise the authority granted by the chief judge under this section only during the normal working hours of the clerk’s office to which they are assigned. This authority shall be exercised without fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1971, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 10, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 21, § 2.

8-8-16.
Duties of district court clerks.

Every clerk of the district court shall record reasonably the judgments and determinations of the court, and account with the state controller and pay over to the general treasurer, as often as by law required, all fines, costs, and other money received by him or her, and also account with and pay over to the town treasurers of the towns in his or her division, as often as by law required, all fines and other money received by him or her belonging to or payable to the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1980, ch. 96, § 3.

8-8-16.1.
Office of clerk/magistrate — Purpose.

The general assembly hereby finds that there exists a need to further expand the capability of the district court to effectively and expeditiously collect all fines, fees, and costs due to the state, consistent with principles of fairness and due process. Therefore, the general assembly hereby creates the position of district court clerk/magistrate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 173, § 1.